California, session 20252026, SB1043.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 10095.6 is added to the Insurance Code, to read:10095.6. The department shall annually prepare a report to the Legislature that includes the change in number of FAIR Plan policies by ZIP Code for the prior calendar year. On or before July 1, 2027, and on or before each July 1 thereafter, the report shall be submitted to the Legislature pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code and publicly posted to the department’s internet website.